Maine, session 132, LD1439.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §4017 is enacted to read:
§4017. Evaluations requiring parental consent
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a school administrative unit may
not conduct an evaluation of a student that includes testing of intellectual, emotional,
behavioral, psychological or physical development or is for the purpose of diagnosing an
intellectual, emotional, behavioral, psychological or physical condition without first
obtaining the signed, written consent of the student's parent or legal guardian.